Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 64 O.S. 2021, Section 1012, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1012. A. The Commissioners of the Land Office, by


formal resolution adopted by a majority vote of the members of the


Commission, shall fix a schedule of fees to be charged for services


rendered by the Land Office. Provided, no fees may be charged to a


lessee above those included in the originally accepted bid,


regardless of improvements to the leased lands. Except as otherwise


provided by law, the fees shall be collected and deposited in the


revolving fund for the Commissioners of the Land Office.


B. The Secretary of the Land Office shall have authority to


issue formal resolutions adopted by the Commissioners of the Land

Req. No. 1233 Page 1


Office, as authorized by the Commissioners. The Commissioners of


the Land Office shall be exempt from Article I of the Administrative


Procedures Act with respect to the adoption and issuance of formal


resolutions of the Commissioners.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1233 RD 1/16/2025 2:19:55 PM



































Req. No. 1233 Page 2